North Carolina, session 2025, SB439.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. MORATORIUM ON OPPORTUNITY SCHOLARSHIPS
SECTION 1. Beginning with the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the State Education
Assistance Authority shall not award any scholarship grant funds under Part 2A of Article 39 of
Chapter 115C of the General Statutes to new persons who did not receive scholarship grant funds
in the prior school year. It is the intent of the General Assembly to eliminate the program for
awarding scholarship grants under Part 2A of Article 39 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes
beginning in the 2037-2038 school year or once all current recipients become ineligible for the
receipt of scholarship grants.

PART II. REDUCE FUNDS FOR OPPORTUNITY SCHOLARSHIPS
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 115C-562.8 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-562.8. The Opportunity Scholarship Grant Fund Reserve.
…
(b) The General Assembly finds that, due to the critical need in this State to provide
opportunity for school choice for North Carolina students, it is imperative that the State provide
an increase of funds for 15 years to the Opportunity Scholarship Grant Fund Reserve. Therefore,
there is appropriated from the General Fund to the Reserve the following amounts for each fiscal
year to be used for the purposes set forth in this section:
Fiscal Year Appropriation
2017-2018 $44,840,000
2018-2019 $54,840,000
2019-2020 $64,840,000
2020-2021 $74,840,000
2021-2022 $84,840,000
2022-2023 $94,840,000
2023-2024 $176,540,000
2024-2025 $191,540,000
2025-2026 $625,000,000
2026-2027 $675,000,000
*S439-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
2027-2028 $700,000,000
2028-2029 $725,000,000
2029-2030 $750,000,000
2030-2031 $775,000,000
2031-2032 $800,000,000
For the 2032-2033 2027-2028 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, there is appropriated
from the General Fund to the Reserve the sum of eight hundred twenty-five million dollars
($825,000,000) five hundred forty-one million five hundred forty thousand dollars
($541,540,000) to be used for the purposes set forth in this section. When developing the base
budget, as defined by G.S. 143C-1-1, for each fiscal year specified in this subsection, the Director
of the Budget shall include the appropriated amount specified in this subsection for that fiscal
year.
…."
SECTION 2.(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, funds
appropriated for the award of opportunity scholarship grants pursuant to Part 2A of Article 39 of
Chapter 115C of the General Statutes are reduced as follows:
(1) Of the recurring funds appropriated to the Board of Governors of The
University of North Carolina for the opportunity scholarship program
pursuant to S.L. 2021-180, by the sum of thirty million dollars ($30,000,000)
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year.
(2) Of the funds appropriated to the Opportunity Scholarship Grant Fund Reserve
for the 2024-2025 fiscal year and allocated from the Reserve for the award of
scholarship grants in the 2025-2026 fiscal year, by the sum of twenty-eight
million four hundred sixty thousand dollars ($28,460,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year.
(3) Of the funds appropriated to the Opportunity Scholarship Grant Fund Reserve,
as follows:
a. By the sum of eighty-three million four hundred sixty thousand dollars
($83,460,000) in recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year.
b. By the sum of an additional fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) in
recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year.
SECTION 2.(c) It is the intent of the General Assembly that any funding increases
in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium and future biennia for the award of scholarship grant funds
under Part 2A of Article 39 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes will be limited to no more
than the annual percentage increase in funding for public schools as reflected in the State Public
School Fund.

PART III. FUNDS FOR PUBLIC SCHOOLS
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the following amounts to be allocated to local school administrative units,
based on average daily membership, to address the needs in our public schools:
(1) For the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the sum of one hundred thirteen million four
hundred sixty thousand dollars ($113,460,000) in recurring funds and the sum
of twenty-eight million four hundred sixty thousand dollars ($28,460,000) in
nonrecurring funds.
(2) For the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the additional sum of fifty million dollars
($50,000,000) in recurring funds.

PART IV. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
Page 2 Senate Bill 439-First Edition